Utah statutes.
78B-15-402.   Effect of registration.

(1)  An unmarried biological father who desires to be notified of a proceeding for adoption of a child must file a notice of the initiation of paternity proceedings as required by Sections 78B-6-110, 78B-6-120, 78B-6-121, and 78B-6-122.

(2)  A registrant shall promptly notify the registry in a record of any change in the information registered.  The Office of Vital Records shall incorporate all new information received into its records but need not affirmatively seek to obtain current information for incorporation in the registry.

